Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 6. Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust and Alaska Advance College Tuition Savings Fund.

Cross references. —

For higher education savings program for certain children committed to the custody of the state, see AS

47.14.400

.

Sec. 14.40.802.
Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust.

The Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust is established in the University of Alaska. The purpose of this trust is to secure obligations to participants and beneficiaries under a postsecondary education savings program operated by the University of Alaska and to provide participants a convenient method of saving for college or other postsecondary education. The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall

adopt policies that provide for the administration, management, promotion, and marketing of the trust;

maintain the trust in compliance with requirements of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code) for a qualified state tuition program as defined in 26 U.S.C. 529;

coordinate savings options established under the trust and the administration of the trust with the Alaska advance college tuition savings fund (AS

14.40.803

), including the creation of common administrative and record-keeping systems, marketing programs, and operating reserves;

establish participation agreements, including application, savings options, and withdrawal procedures;

enter into participation agreements with participants for the

accumulation, investment, and distribution of funds;

payment or reimbursement of qualified higher education expenses; and

benefit of a beneficiary;

enter into contracts with one or more contractors, including investment managers; in determining the persons to act as investment managers, consideration must be given to the qualifications of the contractor, including the contractor’s ability to

administer financial programs with individual account maintenance and reporting;

develop, market, and administer investment options appropriate for the trust; and

augment the savings program with other beneficial products and services;

allow both residents and nonresidents to participate in the trust;

allow the transfer or rollover of funds from the Alaska advance college tuition savings fund and other qualified state tuition programs under 26 U.S.C. 529 and the participation agreement;

allow withdrawals from the trust to be used for qualified higher education expenses, including room and board as allowed by 26 U.S.C. 529;

establish penalties for withdrawals from the trust for nonqualified expenses and other distributions as required under 26 U.S.C. 529 or as provided in the participation agreement;

engage an independent firm of certified public accountants to audit the financial position of the trust.

The board may

divide the trust into multiple investment portfolios;

commingle amounts credited to some or all accounts for investment purposes;

establish trusts and accounts as the board considers appropriate under 26 U.S.C. 529;

require trust participants to pay all administrative fees;

establish earnings reserves as provided in the participation agreement, including reserves for the payment of administrative costs.

The University of Alaska, the board, the state, or an agency of the state is not liable for a loss of funds that are invested under a participation agreement or for the denial of a perceived tax or other benefit. The board shall provide written notice to each applicant that there is no guarantee of any rate of return or benefit and that any risk of loss in account value or other benefit rests exclusively with the participant and the beneficiary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, earnings on funds deposited with the trust are not subject to taxation by the state or a municipality.

Except for needs-based scholarships, funds on deposit with the trust may not be considered by the University of Alaska or an agency of the state to limit eligibility for a state-funded scholarship.

A participant has the right, as provided in the participation agreement, to

change the beneficiary of an account to another individual who is a member of the family of the former beneficiary; or

direct that all or a portion of an account be transferred to an account with a new beneficiary if the new beneficiary is a member of the family of the former beneficiary.

The right to change the beneficiary or to transfer between accounts described in (f) of this section may be denied or limited as provided in the participation agreement, including transfers that would result in contributions or account balances in excess of allowable limits under the participation agreement.

Except as provided under AS

34.40.110(b)(4)

, an account established under this section

is exempt from a claim by the creditors of a participant or of a beneficiary;

is conclusively presumed to be a spendthrift trust;

is not an asset or property of either the participant or the beneficiary;

may not be assigned, pledged, or otherwise used to secure a loan or other advancement;

is not subject to involuntarily transfer or alienation.

Except as permitted in 26 U.S.C. 529, a participant or beneficiary may not directly or indirectly direct the investment of an account or earnings on the account.

A participant may, as provided in the participation agreement, designate a person other than the participant as a successor participant. The designation of a successor participant does not take effect until the participant dies or is declared legally incompetent. If a participant dies or is declared legally incompetent without having effectively designated a successor participant, the beneficiary may designate a successor participant in the manner prescribed above if the beneficiary is not the same person as the successor participant.

The trust, a participation agreement, and this section are intended to comply with the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 529 and shall be interpreted in that manner to the extent permitted by law.

The trust and participation agreements may be modified or amended on a retroactive basis in order to maintain compliance with 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code) and to maintain efficient operation of the trust as determined by the board.

A name, address, or other information identifying a person as a participant or beneficiary in the trust is confidential.

In this section,

“account” means an individual trust account established under this section;

“beneficiary” means any person designated by a participation agreement, or by another method of designation authorized in this section, to benefit from payments for qualified higher education expenses at an eligible educational institution;

“board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska;

“member of the family” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 529(e);

“participant” means a person who has entered into a participation agreement or has been appointed as a participant as provided in this section and in the participation agreement;

“participation agreement” means an agreement between a participant and the board providing for the establishment by the participant of one or more accounts under this section and for the administration of those accounts for the benefit of the participant and the beneficiary;

“qualified higher education expenses” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 529(e);

“trust” means the Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust.

History.

(§ 4 ch 3 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.803.
Alaska advance college tuition savings fund.

The Alaska advance college tuition savings fund is established as a nonlapsing fund of the University of Alaska. The purpose of the fund is to secure obligations to participants under a postsecondary education savings program operated by the University of Alaska and to enhance the ability of the university to provide (1) higher education for the people of the state; (2) wide and affordable access to higher education for residents and their children; (3) an incentive for residents to achieve higher academic standards in grades 7 — 12; and (4) an incentive for residents to continue and complete secondary and postsecondary education. The fund may be divided into separate accounts for accounting purposes.

The fund consists of

permanent fund dividend and cash contributions made under AS

14.40.807

under the terms of an advance college tuition savings contract;

appropriations, gifts, bequests, and contributions; and

income and earnings of the fund.

Assets of the fund shall be expended to make payments to the university and other eligible educational institutions, including payments for refunds, redemptions, and awards under a savings contract or scholarships, costs of administration, and other obligations of the fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 1991; am §§ 2, 3 ch 102 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 3 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.805.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue. [Repealed, § 14 ch 3 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 14.40.806.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.160.]

Sec. 14.40.807.
Contribution to the Alaska Advance College Tuition Savings Fund.

Contributions to the fund under the terms of an advance college tuition savings contract may be made by direct cash payments or by contributions from the permanent fund dividend. The Department of Revenue shall

prepare the permanent fund dividend application to allow an applicant or a parent, legal guardian, or other authorized representative of an applicant who is an unemancipated minor to contribute 50 percent of a dividend to the fund; and

include with each application for a permanent fund dividend an explanation of the advance college tuition savings program, including the right to receive a refund, a disclosure of the potential tax liability of the fund, and disclosure of the possible general effect of the tax liability on the advance college tuition savings program.

The Department of Revenue shall pay contributions directly to the fund.

In order to assure the actuarial soundness of the fund, the legislature may appropriate annually to the fund the sum, certified by the board to the governor and the legislature, that is necessary to restore the fund to an amount that is actuarially sound. The board annually, before January 30, shall make and deliver to the governor and to the legislature a certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to an amount that is actuarially sound, and that sum may be appropriated and paid to the fund during that fiscal year. This subsection does not create a debt or liability of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1990; am §§ 4, 5 ch 61 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 3 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.809.
Powers and duties of the University of Alaska.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska may contract with a purchaser for the purchase of advance college tuition credits for the payment of tuition and other qualified higher education expenses for a beneficiary of any age to attend a branch of the university or other eligible educational institution to which the beneficiary is admitted. A purchaser and a beneficiary may be the same person.

The board shall

make appropriate arrangements as necessary to fulfill the board’s obligations under an advance college tuition savings contract;

establish and adopt a formal plan for administration of the advance college tuition savings program; the terms and conditions of the plan shall be considered a part of an advance college tuition savings contract;

establish investment objectives, criteria, and asset allocation guidelines for the fund based on prudent institutional investor guidelines and actuarial analysis of the earnings requirements for the advance college tuition savings plan;

enter into contracts or agreements considered necessary for the investment of the fund, including contracts or agreements with investment managers, consultants, and other custodians of the fund;

engage a financial advisor to report annually on the investment performance of the fund;

engage an independent firm of certified public accountants to audit the financial position of the fund;

do all acts, whether or not expressly authorized, that the board considers necessary or proper in administering the assets of the fund;

enter into reciprocal agreements with Alaska Pacific University and other eligible educational institutions or state tuition programs that the board determines to be beneficial to the advance college tuition savings program;

coordinate savings options established under the Alaska advance college tuition savings program and the administration of the fund with the Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust (AS

14.40.802

) including the creation of common administrative and record-keeping systems, marketing programs, and operating reserves.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 61 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 102 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 3 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “to report annually” for “to annually report” in (b)(5), deleted “Sheldon Jackson College” preceding “Alaska Pacific University” in (b)(8), and made a related change.

Sec. 14.40.810.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.250.]

Sec. 14.40.811.
Advance college tuition savings contracts.

An advance college tuition savings contract must set out or include by reference to the plan

the name and date of birth of the purchaser and the beneficiary under the contract;

the number of advance college tuition credits purchased under the contract;

the terms and conditions under which the contract may be terminated and refunds made;

the assumption of a contractual obligation by the board to provide funding for specified education benefits for the beneficiary in accordance with the terms of the plan;

the period of time during which the beneficiary may receive the benefits of the contract; and

other terms and conditions the board determines to be appropriate or that are required under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code).

An advance college tuition savings contract may be terminated

if the board determines that the number of purchasers is insufficient to maintain the fund on an actuarially sound basis; or

under other circumstances determined by the board and set out in the advance tuition savings contract or in the plan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 102 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 3 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.815.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.255.]

Sec. 14.40.817.
Definitions.

In AS

14.40.803

—

14.40.817

,

“advance college tuition savings contract” or “contract” means a contract entered into by the board and a purchaser to provide for the qualified higher education expenses of a beneficiary;

“beneficiary” means a designated beneficiary as defined under 26 U.S.C. 529(e)(1) (Internal Revenue Code);

“board” means the Board of Regents of the university;

“eligible educational institution” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 135(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

“fund” means the Alaska advance college tuition savings fund established under AS

14.40.803

;

“plan” means the formal plan for administration of an advance college tuition savings program adopted by the board under AS

14.40.809(b)

;

“purchaser” means the person who is named in the contract and has the rights conferred upon a purchaser under an advance college tuition savings contract;

“qualified higher education expenses” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 529(e)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

“university” means the University of Alaska, including a community college affiliated with the university.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 102 SLA 1997; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 3 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.820.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.300.]

Sec. 14.40.821.
Creation and termination of corporation. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.010.]

Sec. 14.40.825.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.305.]

Sec. 14.40.826.
Board of directors. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.020.]

Sec. 14.40.830.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.310.]

Sec. 14.40.831.
Chair and vice-chair. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.030.]

Sec. 14.40.835.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.315.]

Sec. 14.40.836.
Meetings; staff. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.040.]

Sec. 14.40.840.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.320.]

Sec. 14.40.841.
Alaska Aerospace Corporation fund. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.050.]

Sec. 14.40.845.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.325.]

Sec. 14.40.846.
Insurance coverage; safety program. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.060.]

Sec. 14.40.849.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.850.
Declaration of purpose. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.851.
Space activities location. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.070.]

Sec. 14.40.855.
Fund created. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.856.
Licenses and permits. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.080.]

Sec. 14.40.860.
Limits on loans and grants. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.861.
Purpose of the corporation. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.090.]

Sec. 14.40.865.
Conditions of loans and grants. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.866.
Powers and duties of the corporation. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.100.]

Sec. 14.40.870.
Repayment of loans. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.871.
Regulations. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.110.]

Sec. 14.40.875.
Selection criteria. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.876.
Exercise by corporation of powers within municipalities. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.120.]

Sec. 14.40.880.
Discrimination prohibited. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.881.
Trade secrets confidential. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.130.]

Sec. 14.40.885.
Administering authority. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.886.
Approval of projects by legislature. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.140.]

Sec. 14.40.890.
Funding. [Repealed, § 22 ch 136 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.40.891.
Issuance of bonds, notes, and refunding bonds. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.150.]

Sec. 14.40.896.
Security for bonds. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.160.]

Sec. 14.40.899.
Limitation of liability on bonds. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.170.]

Sec. 14.40.900.
Contractual agreements. [Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.901.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.010.]

Sec. 14.40.902.
Issuance and sale of bonds and notes. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.180.]

Secs. 14.40.903 — 14.40.905.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.015 — 14.42.020.]

Sec. 14.40.906.
Bonds exempt from taxes. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.190.]

Sec. 14.40.907.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.025.]

Sec. 14.40.908.
Independent financial advisor. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.200.]

Sec. 14.40.909.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.030.]

Sec. 14.40.910.
Exceptions. [Repealed, § 2 ch 98 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 14.40.911.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.035.]

Sec. 14.40.912.
Additional powers to secure bonds or obligations under leases. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.210.]

Secs. 14.40.913 — 14.40.915.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.040 — 14.42.045.]

Sec. 14.40.916.
Right of obligee of corporation to bring injunction. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.220.]

Secs. 14.40.917 — 14.90.919.
[Renumbered as AS 14.42.050 — 14.42.055.]

Sec. 14.40.920.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.080.]

Sec. 14.40.921.
Power of corporation to confer upon obligee right to bring action or proceeding. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.230.]

Sec. 14.40.926.
Exemption of real property of corporation from execution or other process. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.240.]

Sec. 14.40.930.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.400.]

Sec. 14.40.931.
Power of corporation to obtain federal aid and cooperation. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.250.]

Sec. 14.40.935.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.405.]

Sec. 14.40.936.
Exemption from taxes and assessments. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.260.]

Sec. 14.40.940.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.410.]

Sec. 14.40.941.
Disposal of surplus property. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.270.]

Sec. 14.40.945.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.415.]

Sec. 14.40.946.
Public loans or donations to or cooperation with corporation. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.280.]

Sec. 14.40.950.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.420.]

Sec. 14.40.951.
Reserve fund. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.290.]

Sec. 14.40.956.
Cooperation with other authorities. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.300.]

Sec. 14.40.960.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.500.]

Sec. 14.40.961.
Investment of revenue. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.310.]

Sec. 14.40.966.
Legality of corporation bonds as investments. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.320.]

Sec. 14.40.990.
Definitions. [Repealed, E.O. No. 115, § 4 (2011). For current law see AS 26.27.900.]